District of Columbia statutes.
29A-928

Repealed

Share and membership certificates — Exemption for attachment, execution and garnishment.

Repealed.

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 485, ch. 397, § 28
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-928.
1981 Ed., § 29-1128.
1973 Ed., § 29-828.